Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Housing Project and Public Building Assistance Act.

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, § 1 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51 — 64, 71.

Suability, and liability, for torts, of public housing authority. 61 ALR2d 1246.

Sec. 18.55.010.
Purpose of AS 18.55.100 — 18.55.290.

The purpose of AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

is to remedy the acute housing shortage that exists in certain localities of the state by undertaking slum clearance, housing for low-income households, housing for persons and their families engaged in national defense activities in the state, and housing projects and housing for veterans and other citizens of the state and to remedy the short supply of necessary public buildings by providing for the financing, construction, and acquisition of public buildings for lease to the state.

History.

(§ 40-7-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For low-income housing tax credit, see 15 AAC 151, art. 8.

Secs. 18.55.020 — 18.55.070.
Alaska State Housing Authority. [Repealed, § 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992.]

Sec. 18.55.080.
Members or employees prohibited from acquiring interest in projects.

A member of the board of directors or employee of the corporation may not acquire an interest, direct or indirect, in a housing or public building project authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, or in property or a contract for materials or services included or planned to be included in a project authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

. If a member of the board of directors or employee owns or controls an interest, the member or employee shall immediately disclose the interest in writing to the corporation. Failure to make disclosure constitutes misconduct in office.

History.

(§ 40-7-4 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 4 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.090.
Removal of members.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 9 SLA 1965.]

Sec. 18.55.100.
Powers of corporation.

To the extent not already provided by AS 18.56, the corporation has all powers necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.290

, including the power to

sue and be sued;

adopt a seal;

have perpetual succession;

adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and regulations;

make and execute contracts and other instruments;

in its own name, own, exchange, transfer, lease, rent, convey, or acquire by eminent domain under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

, or otherwise, real and personal property; provided that no project site or part of a project site may be acquired by eminent domain until the corporation has secured, through negotiation, options for the purchase of at least 50 percent of the properties included in the site, except in disaster areas; in an eminent domain proceeding the court may, upon motion and after a hearing, fix the time when and the terms upon which the parties in possession are required to surrender possession to the plaintiff; if the court finds that urgent public necessity requires, it may grant the plaintiff possession at any time after the proceeding has been commenced;

provide, subject to the applicable planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws, ordinances, and regulations for the construction, improvement, alteration, or repair of a housing or public building project or any part of a housing or public building project, and also, subject to the same restrictions, to provide for the construction, improvement, alteration, repair, planning, financing, and interim operation of a sewer or water system, or part of a sewer or water system, to foster, encourage, and permit the development of housing projects by private and public developers and builders;

operate those housing projects and to act as agent or lessee in developing or administering housing projects undertaken by the federal government;

arrange or contract for services, privileges, works, or facilities for or in connection with a housing project or the occupants of a housing project and notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.470

or in any other provision of law, include in the contract stipulations that the contractor and subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, with any conditions that the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the project, and with any pertinent state law;

establish and revise rent schedules;

insure any real or personal property or operations of the corporation against any risks or hazards;

invest in property or securities in which banks or trust companies may legally invest any money held in reserves or sinking funds or any money not required for immediate disbursement;

purchase its bonds at a price not more than the principal amount of the bonds and accrued interest, all bonds so purchased to be canceled;

investigate and study living and housing conditions and the clearing and reconstructing of slum areas;

arrange or contract for the financing, design, construction, and acquisition of public buildings for lease to the state in accordance with AS 18.55.010 —

18.55.290

;

charge to and collect fees from owners or developers of low-income housing for the application for and allocation of federal low-income housing tax credits;

collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing, and servicing its mortgages, loans, notes, bonds, certificates, commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.470

,

when the local governing body certifies that an area is in need of a housing project under any of the provisions or powers within AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.470

as a result of the earthquakes of 1964 and all results and aftereffects respecting which the governor of the state has certified the need for disaster assistance, the corporation may plan, undertake, and carry out the project in the disaster area;

with the approval of the local governing body, and immediately after the approval, the corporation may acquire real property for the purposes of AS 18.55.010 — 18.55.470, and demolish and remove any structure on the property, and it may pay all costs related to the acquisition, demolition, or removal, including any administrative or relocation expenses, unless payment of the costs are contrary to applicable federal law or regulation;

for the purposes of this subsection, AS

18.55.130

and

18.55.330

do not apply.

Any two or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all of the power conferred by the housing authorities law for the purpose of financing, planning, undertaking, constructing, or operating a housing project or projects located within the area of operation of one or more of the authorities.

Notwithstanding (a)(7) and (15) of this section, a proposed public building project shall be submitted by the corporation to the legislature for review. The corporation may proceed with the public building project only if it is approved by law. An appropriation does not constitute approval by law for purposes of this subsection.

History.

(§ 40-7-6 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 8 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1964; am §§ 3, 4 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 118 SLA 1967; am §§ 1, 2 ch 116 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 1986; am § 33 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For the powers of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation generally, see AS

18.56.090

.

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 15 AAC 150, art. 3.

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

For low-income housing tax credit, see 15 AAC 151, art. 8.

For grant management, see 15 AAC 154, art. 7.

For other grant programs, see 15 AAC 154, art. 9.

Sec. 18.55.105.
Lease of authority’s public buildings to political subdivisions.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 118 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 18.55.110.
Cooperation with and aid of federal government.

For purposes of AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, the corporation may do all things necessary or desirable to cooperate with or act as agent for the federal government, or to secure financial aid for housing projects for veterans of World War II and other citizens of the state, provided that those projects may not be undertaken unless an acute shortage of housing exists. With respect to those projects, the corporation may not be subject to limitations, restrictions, or requirements of other laws, except those relating to land acquisition, prescribing or limiting the procedure or action to be taken in the development or administration of any buildings, property, public works, undertakings, or projects of municipal or public corporations or agencies of the state.

History.

(§ 40-7-7 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 8 SLA 1949; am § 8 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 15 AAC 150, art. 3.

For low-income housing tax credit, see 15 AAC 151, art. 8.

Sec. 18.55.120.
Housing for low-income households.

For purposes of AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, the corporation shall manage and operate housing for low-income households with rentals fixed at the lowest rates consistent with decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings.

History.

(§ 40-7-8 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 8 SLA 1949; am § 9 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 2011)

Sec. 18.55.130.
Qualifications of tenants.

In the operation or management of housing for low-income households, the corporation shall, from time to time, establish rents and requirements for admission of tenants to its housing in each municipality in which the housing of the corporation is located.

Except in the case of leased housing as provided in 42 U.S.C. 1437f, the corporation shall fix the income limits for occupancy in its housing for low-income households after taking into consideration

the family size, composition, age, physical disabilities, and other factors that might affect the rent-paying ability of the family; and

the economic factors that affect the financial stability and solvency of the project.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 7 SLA 2011.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 7 SLA 2011.]

Nothing in this section or AS

18.55.120

limits the power of the corporation to vest in an obligee the right to take possession of a housing project or have a receiver appointed free from the restrictions imposed by this section or AS

18.55.120

in case of default by the corporation.

History.

(§ 40-7-9 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 8 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 159 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 10, 11 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 2006; am §§ 3, 4, 18 ch 7 SLA 2011)

Sec. 18.55.140.
Issuance of bonds, notes, and refunding bonds.

The corporation may issue bonds and notes from time to time in its discretion for a purpose authorized by this chapter and may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 40-7-10 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.150.
Security for bonds.

In conjunction with projects authorized by this chapter, the corporation may issue bonds, including bonds on which the principal and interest are payable

exclusively from the income and revenue of the housing project financed with the proceeds of the bonds;

exclusively from the income and revenue of designated housing projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds;

from its revenue generally; or

exclusively from rents collected on public buildings.

Bonds authorized by (a) of this section may be additionally secured

by a pledge of a grant or contribution from the federal government or from another source;

by a pledge of income or revenue of the corporation; or

by a mortgage of a housing project or other property of the corporation.

History.

(§ 40-7-10 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 12 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.160.
Limitation of liability on bonds.

The members of the board of directors of the corporation and any person executing the bonds issued under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

are not liable personally on the bonds by reason of their issuance.

The bonds of the corporation issued under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

are not a debt of the state or a political or municipal corporation or other subdivision of the state and each bond shall so state on its face. Neither the state nor a political or municipal corporation or other subdivision of the state other than the corporation is liable on the bonds, nor are the bonds payable out of money or property other than those of the corporation.

The corporation may not pledge the faith of the people of the state for a loan or obligation that is entered into under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

.

Bonds of the corporation issued under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

are not a debt, indebtedness, or the borrowing of money within the meaning of any limitation or restriction on the issuance of bonds contained in the constitution or laws of the state.

History.

(§ 40-7-10 ACLA 1949; am § 13 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.170.
Exemption from taxes.

Bonds and other obligations of the corporation issued under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and are public instrumentalities and, together with interest on them and income from them, are exempt from taxes.

History.

(§ 40-7-10 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1966; am § 14 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.180.
Issuance and sale of bonds and notes.

Bonds and notes of the corporation issued under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

are authorized by adoption of a resolution prescribing the date of issuance and maturity, interest rate, denomination, form, conversion privilege, rank or priority, execution, terms of redemption, medium and place of payment. Bonds and notes may be sold in the manner, on the terms, and at the price the corporation determines. Each bond and note is negotiable. The signature of a member of the board of directors of the corporation or an officer of the corporation upon a bond or note or coupon is not invalidated by that person’s ceasing to hold office before the delivery of the bond or note. The recitation of a bond or note that it has been issued in the financing of a housing or public building project under AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.290

is conclusive as to the issuance of the bond or note and the character of the project in a challenge of the validity of the bond or note or the security for it.

History.

(§ 40-7-11 ACLA 1949; am § 6 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 1981; am § 15 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.185.
Prohibited bidding on bonds and notes. [Repealed, § 4 ch 86 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 18.55.187.
Independent financial advisor.

In negotiating the private sale of bonds or bond anticipation notes to an underwriter when that sale is authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, the corporation shall retain a financial advisor who is independent from the underwriter. The financial advisor may not bid on the bonds or notes if offered at public sale or negotiate for their purchase if sold at private sale.

History.

(§ 4 ch 86 SLA 1981; am § 16 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.55.185

.
Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 18.55.190.
Maximum interest rate.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 52 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 18.55.200.
Additional powers to secure bonds or obligations under leases.

When authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, in connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of bonds or lease obligations, the corporation, in addition to its other powers, may

pledge all or a part of its gross or net rents, fees, or revenues to which its right exists or may exist;

mortgage all or a part of its real or personal property, owned or later acquired;

covenant against pledging all or a part of its rents, fees, and revenues, or against mortgaging all or a part of its real or personal property, to which its right or title exists or may come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien on the revenues or property;

covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of a housing or public building project or a part of a housing or public building project;

covenant as to what other, or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it;

covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of the bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds of bonds;

provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds;

covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest on the bonds;

redeem the bonds, and covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions of redemption;

covenant subject to the limitations contained in AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

as to the rents and fees to be charged in the operation of a housing or public building project, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition of these revenues;

create or authorize the creation of special funds for money held for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and covenant as to the use and disposition of this money;

prescribe the procedure by which the terms of a contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which the consent may be given;

covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of a covenant, condition, or obligation, and covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and covenant as to the terms and conditions upon which this declaration and its consequences may be waived;

vest in a trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or a specified proportion of them, the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or covenants securing or relating to the bonds;

vest in one or more trustees the right, in the event of a default by the corporation, to take possession of a housing or public building project or a part of the project, and so long as the corporation continues in default to retain possession and to use, operate, and manage the project, and to collect the rents and revenues from the project, and to dispose of the money according to the agreement between the corporation and the trustees;

provide for the powers and duties of the trustees, and limit the liability of the trustees; and

provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds, or portions of bonds, may enforce a covenant or right securing or relating to the bonds.

History.

(§ 40-7-12 ACLA 1949; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 17 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.210.
Right of obligee of corporation to bring action.

An obligee of the corporation may, in addition to all other rights that may be conferred by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

and subject only to contractual restriction binding upon the obligee, seek an injunction or an action in the nature of an action for mandamus against the members of the board of directors, the corporation, or its officers, agents, or employees for a matter arising out of AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

.

History.

(§ 40-7-13 ACLA 1949; am § 16 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 18 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.220.
Power of corporation to confer upon obligee right to bring action or proceeding.

In conjunction with the exercise of a power authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, the corporation may, by resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract, confer upon an obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, the right upon a default as defined in the resolution or instrument by suit, action, or proceeding

to have possession of a housing or public building project or part of one surrendered to the obligee, with possession retained by the obligee as long as the corporation continues in default;

to obtain the appointment of a receiver of a housing or public building project or part of one and its rents and profits, who may enter, take possession, and for the duration of the default operate and maintain it, collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising, and keep the money in a separate account or accounts to be applied in accordance with the obligations of the corporation as the court directs;

to require the corporation and the members of its board of directors to account as if they were the trustees of an express trust.

History.

(§ 40-7-14 ACLA 1949; am §§ 10, 11 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 19 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.230.
Exemption of real property of corporation from execution or other process.

In conjunction with the exercise of a power authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, the real property of the corporation is exempt from levy and sale by execution. Execution or other judicial process may not issue against it and judgment against the corporation may not be a charge or lien upon its real property. However, this section does not limit the right of an obligee to foreclose or otherwise enforce a mortgage of the corporation or to pursue any remedy for the enforcement of a pledge or lien given by the corporation under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

on its rents, fees, or revenues.

History.

(§ 40-7-15 ACLA 1949; am § 20 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 29 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Sec. 18.55.240.
Power of corporation to obtain federal aid and cooperation.

The corporation may borrow, accept contributions, grants, or other financial assistance from the federal government in aid of any housing or public building project and for this purpose may comply with conditions and enter into the mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or agreements that are necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to obtain financial aid or cooperation from the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance, or operation of a housing or public building project authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

.

History.

(§ 40-7-16 ACLA 1949; am § 12 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 21 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 15 AAC 150, art. 3.

For low-income housing tax credit, see 15 AAC 151, art. 8.

Sec. 18.55.250.
Property of corporation exempt from taxes and assessments.

The property owned by the corporation under the authority granted in AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

is public property used for essential public and governmental purposes, and is exempt from all taxes and special assessments of a municipality, the state, or a political subdivision of the state. However, instead of the payment of taxes on this property, the corporation may make payments to the municipality or political subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by it for the benefit of a housing or public building project.

History.

(§ 40-7-17 ACLA 1949; am § 13 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 22 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The obvious implication of this section is that it is the policy of the legislature that public property used for essential public and government purposes is exempt from local special assessments. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Private leasehold interests in Regional Native Housing Authority or Alaska State Housing Authority projects which rely on federal funding do not appear to be subject to municipal property taxation.
July 24, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.55.255.
Disposal of surplus property.

In conjunction with the exercise of a power authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, the corporation may convey real or personal property that it determines is in excess of its needs. Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, the sale shall be by public auction or by sealed bids at a price not lower than the fair market value determined by an appraisal made within 180 days before the sale by a qualified appraiser. Public notice shall be given by publishing notice of the sale at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the area in which the property to be sold is located and by posting notice of sale in at least two public places in the area. In no event may the auction be held less than 30 days after the last day of publication. If acceptable bids are not received the corporation may sell the property at negotiated sale within six months after the date of the auction. A negotiated sale may not be made on an appraisal made more than nine months before the date of sale. The price at a negotiated sale may not be less than the appraised value.

Real or personal property of the corporation may be conveyed under (a) of this section to a state or federal agency or political subdivision for less than the appraised value without competitive bidding, upon a determination by the board that the terms are fair and proper and in the best interests of the state. Before authorizing a conveyance under this section, the board of directors of the corporation shall consider both the nature of the agency’s or political subdivision’s public services or functions and the terms under which the property was acquired by the corporation.

Property acquired or renovated to provide mental health community housing is not subject to the procedures of (a) or (b) of this section and may be conveyed for less than the fair market value to grantees selected by the Department of Health and Social Services upon terms and conditions consistent with grants administered by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

.

This section does not apply to property that is covered by AS

18.55.320

or

18.55.540

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1976; am §§ 3, 4 ch 181 SLA 1990; am §§ 23, 24 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.260.
Legality of corporation’s bonds as investments.

Bonds of the corporation that are issued under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

are legal and proper investments and security for public and private banking, insurance, and trust funds.

History.

(§ 40-7-18 ACLA 1949; am § 25 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.270.
Recommendations for legislation.

The corporation shall make recommendations for legislation or other action it considers necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

.

History.

(§ 40-7-19 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1965; am § 26 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.280.
Public loans or donations to or cooperation with corporation.

In conjunction with the exercise by the corporation of a power authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, a public body, officer, or agency of the state may

lend or donate money or property to the corporation;

cooperate with it in the planning, construction, or operation of a public housing or public building project;

transfer to it an interest in property, grant an easement, and undertake otherwise authorized construction of facilities adjacent to a project;

furnish or improve otherwise authorized roads, streets, alleys, and sidewalks;

make exceptions from building codes, exercise its planning and zoning powers, and annex the site of a project;

contract to exercise its powers relating to repair, elimination, or closing of unsafe, insanitary, or unfit dwellings;

purchase the bonds of the corporation for a housing or public building project authorized by AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

;

incur the entire expense of improvements made under AS

18.55.010

— 18.55.290;

agree with the corporation that a certain sum or that no sum shall be paid by the corporation to the public body, officer, or agency instead of taxes;

enter into agreements respecting exercise of a power granted in AS 18.55.100 — 18.55.290 if that agreement is approved and executed by the public body or municipality in or adjacent to the project before the project is constructed; and

in general do all things necessary or convenient to cooperate in the planning, construction, or operation of a project.

A sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement under this section may be made without appraisal, public notice or advertisement or bidding. A public body may exercise the powers granted in this section by resolution or ordinance by a majority of the members of the governing body present at the meeting at which it is introduced, and the resolution or ordinance takes effect immediately without publishing or posting.

History.

(§ 40-7-20 ACLA 1949; am § 27 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.288.
Definitions.

In AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.290

,

“corporation” means the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

“project site” means area devoted for a housing project;

“public building” means a publicly owned structure leased to the state for governmental, public, or educational use.

History.

(§ 14 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 118 SLA 1967; am §§ 28, 29 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 18.55.290.
Short title.

AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.290

may be cited as the Housing Project and Public Building Assistance Act.

History.

(§ 40-7-21 ACLA 1949; am § 30 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)